Montana, session 2025, HB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Actions against real estate appraisers, real estate appraisal firms, and appraisal
management companies. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an action for damages or other relief
arising from an appraisal or appraisal review conducted by a real estate appraiser, real estate appraisal firm, or
appraisal management company may not be commenced more than 5 years after the day the appraisal or
appraisal review was completed.
(2) An action for breach of contract subject to the period of limitation found in 27-2-202(1) arising
from an appraisal or appraisal review conducted by a real estate appraiser, real estate appraisal firm, or
appraisal management company may not be commenced more than 8 years after the day the appraisal or
appraisal review was completed.
(3) This section may not be construed as extending the period prescribed by the laws of this state
for the bringing of any action.
(4) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Appraisal" has the same meaning as provided in 37-54-102.
(b) "Appraisal management company" means an entity registered under Title 37, chapter 54, part
5.
(c) "Appraisal review" has the same meaning as provided in 37-54-102.
(d) "Real estate appraisal firm" means an entity engaging a real estate appraiser as an owner,
member, shareholder, partner, employee, or independent contractor to perform an appraisal or appraisal
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 135
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 135
review.
(e) "Real estate appraiser" means an individual licensed or certified under Title 37, chapter 54.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
27, chapter 2, part 2, and the provisions of Title 27, chapter 2, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 135
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 135, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 135
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT CREATING STATUTES OF REPOSE FOR CLAIMS AGAINST REAL ESTATE APPRAISERS, REAL
ESTATE APPRAISAL FIRMS, AND APPRAISAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES; AND PROVIDING
DEFINITIONS.”